Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5208
Dental education program in comprehensive dentistry; established; purpose; implementation.

There is hereby established a statewide dental education program in comprehensive dentistry for the purpose of training dentists in the clinic of the College of Dentistry during the senior year of dental training. The Dean of the College of Dentistry of the University of Nebraska shall be responsible for implementing the comprehensive dentistry program.

Laws 1975, LB 571, § 8.